District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.04

Appeals.

An employee who has received a specific notice that he or she has been identified for separation from his or her position through a reduction-in-force action may file an appeal with the Office of Employee Appeals if he or she believes that his or her agency has incorrectly applied the provisions of this subchapter or the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this subchapter. An appeal must be filed no later than 30 calendar days after the effective date of the action. The filing of an appeal shall not serve to delay the effective date of the action.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2404, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(x)(1), 45 DCR 2464
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-189, § 2(c), 51 DCR 6734
1981 Ed., § 1-625.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-354.4.
D.C. Law 15-189 substituted “30” for “15”.
Applicability of § 101(x) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-624.01.